New York, session 2025-2026, A2479.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 2827-a of the public authorities 2 law, as added by chapter 506 of the laws of 2009, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no state authority shall 5 hereafter have the power to organize any subsidiary corporation unless 6 the legislature shall have enacted a law granting such state authority 7 such power for the organization of a specific corporation, provided, 8 however, that a state authority may organize a subsidiary corporation 9 [pursuant to the following requirements: 10 a. the purpose for which the subsidiary corporation shall be organized 11 shall be for a project or projects which the state authority has the 12 power to pursue pursuant to its corporate purposes; 13 b. the primary reason for which the subsidiary corporation shall be 14 organized shall be to limit the potential liability impact of the 15 subsidiary's project or projects on the authority or because state or 16 federal law requires that the purpose of a subsidiary be undertaken 17 through a specific corporate structure; and 18 c. the] without the legislature enacting a law granting such state 19 authority such power if such authority provides written notification 20 of its intention to organize such subsidiary corporation sixty days 21 prior to such organization. Such written notice shall be provided to the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05888-01-5 A. 2479 2 1 governor, the speaker of the assembly, and the temporary president of 2 the senate and shall be subject to denial by the governor, the senate, 3 or the assembly. Denial by the governor shall take the form of a signed 4 certification by the governor. Denial by either house of the legisla- 5 ture shall take the form of a resolution by such house. If the governor 6 and each house of the legislature receives notification of a proposed 7 organization during the months of January through March, the governor 8 and each house of the legislature may take any such action within sixty 9 days of receiving such notification, provided however, if the governor 10 and each house of the legislature receives notification of a proposed 11 organization and there is not sixty days remaining during the legisla- 12 tive session, the legislature may take any such action within sixty days 13 of January first of the following year. The state authority may not 14 effectuate the proposed organization of the subsidiary until such sixty 15 day period has elapsed. Any subsidiary corporation shall make the 16 reports and other disclosures as are required of state authorities, 17 unless the subsidiary corporation's operations and finances are consol- 18 idated with those of the authority of which it is a subsidiary. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.